bulgarian.aff
flag *Y:
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—¿“
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—≈
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—≈… »
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—≈À»
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—≈À»“≈
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—≈Ã
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—≈Õ
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—≈Õ¿
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—≈Õ¿“¿
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—≈Õ»
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—≈Õ»“≈
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—≈Õ»ﬂ
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—≈Õ»ﬂ“
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—≈ÕŒ
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—≈ÕŒ“Œ
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—≈“≈
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—≈ÿ
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—≈ÿ≈
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—»
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—À¿
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—À¿“¿
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—À»
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—À»“≈
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—À»ﬂ
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—À»ﬂ“
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—ÀŒ
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—ÀŒ“Œ
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—Œ’
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—Œ’¿
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—Œ’Ã≈
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—Œ’“≈
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—⁄À
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—ﬂÀ
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—ﬂÀ¿
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—ﬂÀ¿“¿
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—ﬂÀ»ﬂ
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—ﬂÀ»ﬂ“
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—ﬂÀŒ
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—ﬂÀŒ“Œ
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—ﬂ’
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—ﬂ’¿
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—ﬂ’Ã≈
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—ﬂ’“≈
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—ﬂŸ
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—ﬂŸ¿
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—ﬂŸ¿“¿
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—ﬂŸ»
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—ﬂŸ»“≈
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—ﬂŸ»ﬂ
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—ﬂŸ»ﬂ“
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—ﬂŸŒ
    ¿ — ¿    >      -¿—¿,¿—ﬂŸŒ“Œ
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—¿“
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—≈
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—≈… »
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—≈À»
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—≈À»“≈
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—≈Ã
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—≈Õ
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—≈Õ¿
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—≈Õ¿“¿
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—≈Õ»
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—≈Õ»“≈
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—≈Õ»ﬂ
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—≈Õ»ﬂ“
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—≈ÕŒ
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—≈ÕŒ“Œ
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—≈“≈
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—≈ÿ
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—≈ÿ≈
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—»
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—À¿
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—À¿“¿
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—À»
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—À»“≈
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—À»ﬂ
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—À»ﬂ“
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—ÀŒ
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—ÀŒ“Œ
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—Œ’
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—Œ’¿
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—Œ’Ã≈
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—Œ’“≈
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—⁄À
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—ﬂÀ
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—ﬂÀ¿
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—ﬂÀ¿“¿
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—ﬂÀ»ﬂ
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—ﬂÀ»ﬂ“
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—ﬂÀŒ
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—ﬂÀŒ“Œ
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—ﬂ’
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—ﬂ’¿
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—ﬂ’Ã≈
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—ﬂ’“≈
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—ﬂŸ
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—ﬂŸ¿
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—ﬂŸ¿“¿
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—ﬂŸ»
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—ﬂŸ»“≈
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—ﬂŸ»ﬂ
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—ﬂŸ»ﬂ“
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—ﬂŸŒ
    ≈ — ¿    >      -≈—¿,≈—ﬂŸŒ“Œ
      ¿      >      - ¿, ¿“
      ¿      >      - ¿, À¿
      ¿      >      - ¿, À¿“¿
      ¿      >      - ¿, À»
      ¿      >      - ¿, À»“≈
      ¿      >      - ¿, À»ﬂ
      ¿      >      - ¿, À»ﬂ“
      ¿      >      - ¿, ÀŒ
      ¿      >      - ¿, ÀŒ“Œ
      ¿      >      - ¿, Œ’
      ¿      >      - ¿, Œ’¿
      ¿      >      - ¿, Œ’Ã≈
      ¿      >      - ¿, Œ’“≈
      ¿      >      - ¿, ⁄À
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊¿Ÿ
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊¿Ÿ¿
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊¿Ÿ¿“¿
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊¿Ÿ»
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊¿Ÿ»“≈
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊¿Ÿ»ﬂ
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊¿Ÿ»ﬂ“
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊¿ŸŒ
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊¿ŸŒ“Œ
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈… »
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈À
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈À¿
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈À¿“¿
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈À»
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈À»“≈
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈À»ﬂ
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈À»ﬂ“
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈ÀŒ
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈ÀŒ“Œ
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈Ã
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈Õ
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈Õ¿
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈Õ¿“¿
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈Õ»
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈Õ»“≈
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈Õ»ﬂ
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈Õ»ﬂ“
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈ÕŒ
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈ÕŒ“Œ
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈“≈
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈’
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈’¿
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈’Ã≈
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈’“≈
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈ÿ
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊≈ÿ≈
      ¿      >      - ¿,◊»
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿, ¿
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿, ¿À
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿, ¿À¿
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿, ¿À¿“¿
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿, ¿À»
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿, ¿À»“≈
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿, ¿À»ﬂ
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿, ¿À»ﬂ“
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿, ¿ÀŒ
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿, ¿ÀŒ“Œ
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿, ¿’
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿, ¿’¿
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿, ¿’Ã≈
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿, ¿’“≈
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊¿“
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈… »
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈À
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈À¿
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈À¿“¿
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈À»
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈À»“≈
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈À»ﬂ
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈À»ﬂ“
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈ÀŒ
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈ÀŒ“Œ
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈Ã
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈“≈
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈’
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈’¿
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈’Ã≈
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈’“≈
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈ÿ
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈ÿ≈
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈Ÿ
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈Ÿ¿
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈Ÿ¿“¿
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈Ÿ»
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈Ÿ»“≈
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈Ÿ»ﬂ
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈Ÿ»ﬂ“
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈ŸŒ
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊≈ŸŒ“Œ
    ◊ ¿      >      -◊¿,◊»
