bulgarian.dict
внеса/Y
врека/Y
всмуча/Y
втека/Y
втреса/Y
възнеса/Y
донеса/Y
допека/Y
доплача/Y
допринеса/Y
дорека/Y
дотека/Y
дъвча/Y
завтека/Y
задъвча/Y
занеса/Y
запаса/Y
запека/Y
заплача/Y
зарека/Y
зареча/Y
засмуча/Y
засуча/Y
затека/Y
затреса/Y
затъпча/Y
изнеса/Y
изпаса/Y
изпека/Y
изплача/Y
изпотъпча/Y
изрека/Y
изсмуча/Y
изсуча/Y
изтека/Y
изтъпча/Y
надвнеса/Y
надонеса/Y
нанеса/Y
напаса/Y
напека/Y
наплача/Y
нарека/Y
насуча/Y
натека/Y
натъпча/Y
обрека/Y
опаса/Y
опека/KY
оплача/Y
осмуча/Y
отека/Y
отнеса/Y
отрека/Y
оттека/Y
отъпча/Y
паса/Y
пека/Y
плака/Y
плача/Y
поднеса/Y
подпека/Y
подсуча/Y
поизнеса/Y
понапека/Y
понаплача/Y
понеса/Y
поопаса/Y
поопека/Y
пооплача/Y
поотека/Y
попаса/Y
попека/Y
поплача/Y
поразплача/Y
поразтъпча/Y
порека/Y
посмуча/Y
потека/Y
потреса/Y
потъпча/Y
превъзнеса/Y
предрека/Y
предъвча/Y
пренеса/Y
препаса/Y
препека/Y
пресуча/Y
претъпча/Y
привнеса/Y
принеса/Y
припека/Y
приплача/Y
притека/Y
притъпча/Y
произнеса/Y
произтека/Y
пронеса/Y
проплача/Y
просмуча/Y
протека/Y
разнеса/Y
разпаса/Y
разплача/Y
разсуча/Y
разтека/Y
разтреса/Y
разтъпча/Y
самоотрека/Y
сдъвча/Y
смуча/Y
снеса/Y
спека/Y
стека/Y
стъпча/Y
суча/Y
тека/Y
треса/Y
тъпча/Y
унеса/Y
усуча/Y
утъпча/Y
